Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska38-2408
Core educational requirements, defined.

Core educational requirements means courses necessary for licensure as a nursing home administrator and includes courses in patient care and services, social services, financial management, administration, and rules, regulations, and standards relating to the operation of a health care facility.

Laws 2007, LB463, § 823.